Utah statutes.
26-8b-401.   Education and training.

(1)  The bureau shall work in cooperation with federal, state, and local agencies and schools, to encourage individuals to complete courses on the administration of CPR and the use of an AED.

(2)  A person who owns or leases an AED shall encourage each person who is likely to use the AED to complete courses on the administration of CPR and the use of an AED.

